Washington statutes.
RCW 38.40.210

Military department rental and lease account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The military department rental and lease account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the rental or lease of state-owned military department property must be deposited into the account. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for operating and maintenance costs of military property.

[ 2005 c 252 s 2.]